Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8528.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Proposition to be submitted to the people. -- At the general election to be held
on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 2026, there shall be submitted to the people
(“People”) of the State of Rhode Island (“State”), for their approval or rejection, the following
proposition:
"Shall the action of the general assembly, by an act passed at the January 2026 session,
authorizing the issuance of bonds, refunding bonds, and temporary notes of the State of Rhode
Island for the capital projects and in the amount with respect to each such project listed below be
approved, and the issuance of bonds, refunding bonds, and/or temporary notes authorized in
accordance with the provisions of said act?"
Project
(1) Higher Education Facilities $215,000,000
Approval of this question will allow the State to issue general obligation bonds, refunding
bonds, and/or temporary notes in an amount not to exceed two hundred and fifteen million dollars
($215,000,000) for capital improvements to higher education facilities, to be allocated as follows:
(a) University of Rhode Island Integrated Health Building $105,000,000
Provides one hundred and five million dollars ($105,000,000) for the construction of the
new Integrated Health Building on the University of Rhode Island’s Kingston campus to advance
health education, clinical training, and workforce development.
(b) RIC Adams Library Renovations $50,000,000

Provides fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to fund the construction of a student success
and career readiness center and renovations located at the Adams Library on the Rhode Island
College campus.
(c) CCRI Workforce Innovation Center $60,000,000
Provides sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) to fund the construction of a new workforce
innovation center located on the Warwick campus of the Community College of Rhode Island.
Funds will be used for the construction of a modern career and technical educational facility
designed to support workforce readiness and address critical workforce shortages in the State.
(2) Housing and Homeownership $120,000,000
Approval of this question will allow the state to issue general obligation bonds, refunding
bonds, and/or temporary notes in an amount not to exceed one hundred twenty million dollars
($120,000,000) to increase and preserve the availability of affordable and accessible housing to
meet the needs of all Rhode Islanders and support community revitalization through the
redevelopment of existing structures, new construction, property acquisition, and infrastructure
improvements, to be allocated as follows:
(a) Affordable Housing and Homeownership Programs $100,000,000
Provides one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) to the executive office of housing to
increase and preserve the availability of affordable and accessible housing, including but not
limited to redevelopment of existing structures, new construction, property acquisition, and
infrastructure improvements. Of this amount, not less than twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000) shall be allocated toward increasing the production of housing intended for
homeownership.
(b) I-195 Redevelopment District Housing Infrastructure $20,000,000
Provides twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to the I-195 Redevelopment District
Commission, established pursuant to chapter 64.14 of title 42 of the general laws, for land
acquisition or assembly, environmental remediation, infrastructure and utility installation, site
preparation or development, and other site readiness improvements to support housing
development within the I-195 Redevelopment District.
(3) Economic Development $115,000,000
Approval of this question will allow the state to issue general obligation bonds, refunding
bonds, and/or temporary notes in an amount not to exceed one hundred fifteen million dollars
($115,000,000) to fund industrial facilities infrastructure improvements, to be allocated as follows:
(a) I-195 Redevelopment District Site Readiness $35,000,000
Provides thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) to the I-195 Redevelopment District
LC006416 - Page 2 of 13

Commission for land acquisition or assembly, environmental remediation, infrastructure and utility
installation, site preparation or development, and other site readiness improvements within the I-
195 Redevelopment District established pursuant to chapter 64.14 of title 42 of the general laws.
(b) Quonset Business Park Infrastructure $35,000,000
Provides thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) to the Quonset Development
Corporation for infrastructure improvements, site preparation, utility installation, and other capital
investments within the Quonset Business Park established pursuant to chapter 64.10 of title 42 of
the general laws.
(c) Rhode Island Life Science Hub $20,000,000
Provides twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to support the Rhode Island Life Science
Hub for the development of life sciences infrastructure, facilities, research and commercialization
space, and related capital investments intended to advance the growth of the life sciences sector in
the state.
(d) Economic Development Infrastructure Fund $25,000,000
Provides twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) to be administered by the Rhode Island
Commerce Corporation, established pursuant to § 42-64-1 et seq. of the general laws, to provide
grants, loans, loan guarantees, equity investments, or other forms of financial assistance for
infrastructure, facilities, site development, and related capital investments that support Rhode
Island’s ocean, defense, life sciences, data analytics, and other growth industries.
(4) Career and Technical Education $50,000,000
Approval of this question will allow the State to issue general obligation bonds, refunding
bonds, and/or temporary notes in an amount not to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to
provide local education agencies financing for the creation of new and/or the improvement of
existing career and technical education programs.
(5) Green Economy and Clean Energy Bonds $50,000,000
Approval of this question will allow the State to issue general obligation bonds, refunding
bonds, and/or temporary notes in an amount not to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for
environmental and recreational purposes, to be allocated as follows:
(a) Brownfields Remediation and Economic Development $3,000,000
Provides three million dollars ($3,000,000) for up to eighty percent (80%) matching grants
to public, private, and/or non-profit entities for brownfield remediation projects.
(b) Facility Improvements $8,000,000
Provides eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for the renovation and repair of existing
facilities and recreational venues as well as the development and construction of new facilities and
LC006416 - Page 3 of 13

parks.
(c) Local Recreation Projects $1,000,000
Provides one million dollars ($1,000,000) for up to eighty percent (80%) matching grants
for municipalities to acquire, develop, or rehabilitate local recreational facilities to meet the
growing needs for active outdoor recreational facilities.
(d) Marine Infrastructure Development $1,000,000
Provides one million dollars ($1,000,000) to provide asset protection and emergency repair
needs for most facilities, including recreational facilities, office space, marine infrastructure, and
more.
(e) Resilient Rhody Infrastructure Fund $20,000,000
Provides twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to provide financial assistance to local
governmental units for restoring and/or improving resiliency of infrastructure, vulnerable coastal
habitats, and restoring rivers and stream floodplains. These funds will be prioritized to leverage
significant funds to support local programs to improve community resiliency, stormwater
abatement and public safety in the face of increased flooding, major storm events, and
environmental degradation.
(f) Narragansett Bay Watershed Restoration $7,000,000
Provides seven million dollars ($7,000,000) for activities to restore and protect the water
quality and enhance the economic viability and environmental sustainability of Narragansett Bay
and the State's watersheds. Eligible activities include nonpoint source pollution abatement,
including stormwater management; nutrient loading abatement; commercial, industrial and
agricultural pollution abatement; and riparian buffer and watershed ecosystem restoration.
(g) Energy Efficiency $10,000,000
Provides ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for activities related to the financing of energy
efficiency infrastructure.
(6) Cultural Economy $50,000,000
Approval of this question will allow the State to issue general obligation bonds, refunding
bonds, and/or temporary notes in an amount not to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for
the construction of a new Rhode Island State History Center.
(a) State History Center $45,000,000
Provides forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) for the construction of a new Rhode Island State
History Center.
(b) State Preservation Grants Program $5,000,000
Provides five million dollars ($5,000,000) in matching grants administered by the Rhode
LC006416 - Page 4 of 13

Island Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission to cities, towns and nonprofit
organizations for capital improvements to public historic sites, museums and cultural art centers
located in historic structures, and heritage museums throughout the State.
SECTION 2. Ballot labels and applicability of general election laws. -- The Secretary of
State shall prepare and deliver to the State Board of Elections ballot labels for each of the projects
provided for in Section 1 hereof with the designations "approve" or "reject" provided next to the
description of each such project to enable voters to approve or reject each such proposition. The
general election laws, so far as consistent herewith, shall apply to this proposition.
SECTION 3. Approval of projects by the people. -- If a majority of the People voting on
the proposition in Section 1 hereof shall vote to approve any project stated therein, said project
shall be deemed to be approved by the People. The authority to issue bonds, refunding bonds and/or
temporary notes of the State shall be limited to the aggregate amount for all such projects as set
forth in the proposition, which has been approved by the People.
SECTION 4. Bonds for the capital development program. -- The General Treasurer is
hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the Governor, and in accordance with the
provisions of this Act to issue capital development bonds in serial form, in the name of and on
behalf of the State, in amounts as may be specified by the Governor in an aggregate principal
amount not to exceed the total amount for all projects approved by the People and designated as
"capital development loan of 2026 bonds." Provided, however, that the aggregate principal amount
of such capital development bonds and of any temporary notes outstanding at any one time issued
in anticipation thereof pursuant to Section 7 hereof shall not exceed the total amount for all such
projects approved by the People. All provisions in this Act relating to "bonds" shall also be deemed
to apply to "refunding bonds."
Capital development bonds issued under this Act shall be in denominations of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) each, or multiples thereof, and shall be payable in any coin or currency of the
United States which at the time of payment shall be legal tender for public and private debts. These
capital development bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at specified time or times, but not
mature beyond the end of the twentieth (20th) State fiscal year following the fiscal year in which
they are issued; bear interest payable semi-annually at a specified rate or different or varying rates:
be payable at designated time or times at specified place or places; be subject to express terms of
redemption or recall, with or without premium; be in a form, with or without interest coupons
attached; carry such registration, conversion, reconversion, transfer, debt retirement, acceleration
and other provisions as may be fixed by the General Treasurer, with the approval by the Governor,
upon each issue of such capital development bonds at the time of each issue. Whenever the
LC006416 - Page 5 of 13

Governor shall approve the issuance of such capital development bonds, the Governor’s approval
shall be certified to the Secretary of State; the bonds shall be signed by the General Treasurer and
countersigned by Secretary of State and shall bear the seal of the State. The signature approval of
the Governor shall be endorsed on each bond.
SECTION 5. Refunding bonds for the 2026 capital development program. -- The General
Treasurer is hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the Governor, and in
accordance with the provisions of this Act, to issue bonds to refund the 2026 capital development
program bonds, in the name of and on behalf of the State, in amounts as may be specified by the
Governor in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed the total amount approved by the People,
to be designated as "capital development program loan of 2026 refunding bonds" (hereinafter
"Refunding Bonds").
The General Treasurer with the approval of the Governor shall fix the terms and form of
any Refunding Bonds issued under this Act in the same manner as the capital development bonds
issued under this Act, except that the Refunding Bonds may not mature more than twenty (20) years
from the date of original issue of the capital development bonds being refunded.
The proceeds of the Refunding Bonds, exclusive of any premium and accrual interest and
net the underwriters’ cost, and cost of bond issuance, shall, upon their receipt, be paid by the
General Treasurer immediately to the paying agent for the capital development bonds which are to
be called and prepaid. The paying agent shall hold the Refunding Bond proceeds in trust until they
are applied to prepay the capital development bonds. While such proceeds are held in trust, the
proceeds may be invested for the benefit of the State in obligations of the United States of America
or the State.
If the General Treasurer shall deposit with the paying agent for the capital development
bonds the proceeds of the Refunding Bonds, or proceeds from other sources, amounts that, when
invested in obligations of the United States or the State, are sufficient to pay all principal, interest,
and premium, if any, on the capital development bonds until these bonds are called for prepayment,
then such capital development bonds shall not be considered debts of the State for any purpose
starting from the date of deposit of such monies with the paying agent. The Refunding Bonds shall
continue to be a debt of the State until paid.
The term "bond" shall include "note," and the term "refunding bonds" shall include
"refunding notes" when used in this Act.
SECTION 6. Proceeds of the capital development program. -- The General Treasurer is
directed to deposit the proceeds from the sale of capital development bonds issued under this Act,
exclusive of premiums and accrued interest and net the underwriters’ cost, and cost of bond
LC006416 - Page 6 of 13

issuance, in one or more of the depositories in which the funds of the State may be lawfully kept in
special accounts (hereinafter cumulatively referred to as the "capital development bond fund")
appropriately designated for each of the projects set forth in Section 1 hereof which shall have been
approved by the People to be used for the purpose of paying the cost of all such projects so
approved.
All monies in the capital development bond fund shall be expended for the purposes
specified in the proposition provided for in Section 1 hereof under the direction and supervision of
the Director of Administration (hereinafter referred to as "Director"). The Director or his or her
designee shall be vested with all power and authority necessary or incidental to the purposes of this
Act, including but not limited to, the following authority: (a) To acquire land or other real property
or any interest, estate or right therein as may be necessary or advantageous to accomplish the
purposes of this Act; (b) To direct payment for the preparation of any reports, plans and
specifications, and relocation expenses and other costs such as for furnishings, equipment
designing, inspecting and engineering, required in connection with the implementation of any
projects set forth in Section 1 hereof; (c) To direct payment for the costs of construction,
rehabilitation, enlargement, provision of service utilities, and razing of facilities, and other
improvements to land in connection with the implementation of any projects set forth in Section 1
hereof; and (d) To direct payment for the cost of equipment, supplies, devices, materials and labor
for repair, renovation or conversion of systems and structures as necessary for the 2026 capital
development program bonds or notes hereunder from the proceeds thereof. No funds shall be
expended in excess of the amount of the capital development bond fund designated for each project
authorized in Section 1 hereof. With respect to the bonds and temporary notes described in Section
1, the proceeds shall be used for the following purposes:
Question 1, relating to bonds in the amount of two hundred and fifteen million dollars
($215,000,000) to provide funding for higher education facilities to be allocated as follows:
(a) University of Rhode Island Integrated Health Building $105,000,000
Provides one hundred and five million dollars ($105,000,000) for the construction of the
new Integrated Health Building on the University of Rhode Island’s Kingston campus to advance
health education, clinical training, and workforce development.
(b) RIC Adams Library Renovations $50,000,000
Provides fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to fund the construction of a student success
and career readiness center and renovations located at the Adams Library the Rhode Island College
campus.
(c) CCRI Workforce Innovation Center $60,000,000
LC006416 - Page 7 of 13

Provides sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) to fund the construction of a new workforce
innovation center located on the Warwick campus of the Community College of Rhode Island.
Funds will be used for the construction of a modern career and technical educational facility
designed to support workforce readiness and address critical workforce shortages in the State.
Question 2, relating to bonds in the amount of one hundred and twenty million dollars
($120,000,000) to increase and preserve the availability of affordable and accessible housing to
meet the needs of all Rhode Islanders and support community revitalization through the
redevelopment of existing structures, new construction, property acquisition, and infrastructure
improvements, to be allocated as follows:
(a) Affordable Housing and Homeownership Programs $100,000,000
Provides one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) to the executive office of housing to
increase and preserve the availability of affordable and accessible housing, including but not
limited to redevelopment of existing structures, new construction, property acquisition, and
infrastructure improvements. Of this amount, not less than twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000) shall be allocated toward increasing the production of housing intended for
homeownership.
(b) I-195 Redevelopment District Housing Infrastructure $20,000,000
Provides twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to the I-195 Redevelopment District
Commission, established pursuant to chapter 64.14 of title 42 of the general laws, for land
acquisition or assembly, environmental remediation, infrastructure and utility installation, site
preparation or development, and other site readiness improvements to support housing
development within the I-195 Redevelopment District.
Question 3, relating to bonds in the amount of one hundred and fifteen million dollars
($115,000,000) to fund industrial facilities infrastructure improvements, to be allocated as follows:
(a) I-195 Redevelopment District Site Readiness $35,000,000
Provides thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) to the I-195 Redevelopment District
Commission for land acquisition or assembly, environmental remediation, infrastructure and utility
installation, site preparation or development, and other site readiness improvements within the I-
195 Redevelopment District established pursuant to chapter 64.14 of title 42 of the general laws.
(b) Quonset Business Park Infrastructure $35,000,000
Provides thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) to the Quonset Development
Corporation for infrastructure improvements, site preparation, utility installation, and other capital
investments within the Quonset Business Park established pursuant to chapter 64.10 of title 42 of
the general laws.
LC006416 - Page 8 of 13

(c) Rhode Island Life Science Hub $20,000,000
Provides twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to support the Rhode Island Life Science
Hub for the development of life sciences infrastructure, facilities, research and commercialization
space, and related capital investments intended to advance the growth of the life sciences sector in
the state.
(d) Economic Development Infrastructure Fund $25,000,000
Provides twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) to be administered by the Rhode Island
Commerce Corporation, established pursuant to § 42-64-1 et seq. of the general laws, to provide
grants, loans, loan guarantees, equity investments, or other forms of financial assistance for
infrastructure, facilities, site development, and related capital investments that support Rhode
Island’s ocean, defense, life sciences, data analytics, and other growth industries.
Question 4, relating to bonds in the amount of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to provide
local education agencies financing for the creation of new and/or the improvement of existing
career and technical education programs.
Question 5, relating to bonds in the amount of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for
environmental and recreational purposes, to be allocated as follows:
(a) Brownfields Remediation and Economic Development $3,000,000
Provides three million dollars ($3,000,000) for up to eighty percent (80%) matching grants
to public, private, and/or non-profit entities for brownfield remediation projects.
(b) Facility Improvements $8,000,000
Provides eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for the renovation and repair of existing
facilities and recreational venues as well as the development and construction of new facilities and
parks.
(c) Local Recreation Projects $1,000,000
Provides one million dollars ($1,000,000) for up to eighty percent (80%) matching grants
for municipalities to acquire, develop, or rehabilitate local recreational facilities to meet the
growing needs for active outdoor recreational facilities.
(d) Marine Infrastructure Development $1,000,000
Provides one million dollars ($1,000,000) to provide asset protection and emergency repair
needs for most facilities, including recreational facilities, office space, marine infrastructure, and
more.
(e) Resilient Rhody Infrastructure Fund $20,000,000
Provides twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to provide financial assistance to local
governmental units for restoring and/or improving resiliency of infrastructure, vulnerable coastal
LC006416 - Page 9 of 13

habitats, and restoring rivers and stream floodplains. These funds will be prioritized to leverage
significant funds to support local programs to improve community resiliency, stormwater
abatement and public safety in the face of increased flooding, major storm events, and
environmental degradation.
(f) Narragansett Bay Watershed Restoration $7,000,000
Provides seven million dollars ($7,000,000) for activities to restore and protect the water
quality and enhance the economic viability and environmental sustainability of Narragansett Bay
and the State's watersheds. Eligible activities include nonpoint source pollution abatement,
including stormwater management; nutrient loading abatement; commercial, industrial and
agricultural pollution abatement; and riparian buffer and watershed ecosystem restoration.
(g) Energy Efficiency $10,000,000
Provides ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for activities related to the financing of energy
efficiency infrastructure.
Question 6, relating to bonds in the amount of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to provide
funding for cultural economy efforts to be allocated as follows:
(a) State History Center $45,000,000
Provides forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) for the construction of a new Rhode
Island State History Center.
(b) State Preservation Grants Program $5,000,000
Provides five million dollars ($5,000,000) in matching grants administered by the Rhode
Island Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission to cities, towns and nonprofit
organizations for capital improvements to public historic sites, museums and cultural art centers
located in historic structures, and heritage museums throughout the State.
SECTION 7. Sale of bonds and notes. -- Any bonds or notes issued under the authority of
this Act shall be sold at not less than the principal amount thereof, in such mode and on such terms
and conditions as the General Treasurer, with the approval of the Governor, shall deem to be in the
best interests of the State.
Any premiums and accrued interest, net of the cost of bond issuance and underwriter’s
discount, which may be received on the sale of the capital development bonds or notes shall become
part of the Rhode Island Capital Plan Fund of the State, unless directed by federal law or regulation
to be used for some other purpose.
In the event that the amount received from the sale of the capital development bonds or
notes exceeds the amount necessary for the purposes stated in Section 6 hereof, the surplus may be
used to the extent possible to retire the bonds as the same may become due, to redeem them in
LC006416 - Page 10 of 13

accordance with the terms thereof or otherwise to purchase them as the General Treasurer, with the
approval of the Governor, shall deem to be in the best interests of the State.
Any bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this Act and coupons on any capital
development bonds, if properly executed by the manual or electronic signatures of officers of the
State in office on the date of execution, shall be valid and binding according to their tenor,
notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor, any or all such officers shall
for any reason have ceased to hold office.
SECTION 8. Bonds and notes to be tax exempt and general obligations of the State. -- All
bonds and notes issued under the authority of this Act shall be exempt from taxation in the State
and shall be general obligations of the State, and the full faith and credit of the State is hereby
pledged for the due payment of the principal and interest on each of such bonds and notes as the
same shall become due.
SECTION 9. Investment of monies in fund. -- All monies in the capital development fund
not immediately required for payment pursuant to the provisions of this Act may be invested by the
investment commission, as established by Chapter 10 of Title 35, entitled “State Investment
Commission,” pursuant to the provisions of such chapter; provided, however, that the securities in
which the capital development fund is invested shall remain a part of the capital development fund
until exchanged for other securities; and provided further, that the income from investments of the
capital development fund shall become a part of the general fund of the State and shall be applied
to the payment of debt service charges of the State, unless directed by federal law or regulation to
be used for some other purpose, or to the extent necessary, to rebate to the United States treasury
any income from investments (including gains from the disposition of investments) of proceeds of
bonds or notes to the extent deemed necessary to exempt (in whole or in part) the interest paid on
such bonds or notes from federal income taxation.
SECTION 10. Appropriation. -- To the extent the debt service on these bonds is not
otherwise provided, a sum sufficient to pay the interest and principal due each year on bonds and
notes hereunder is hereby annually appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise
appropriated.
SECTION 11. Advances from general fund. -- The General Treasurer is authorized, with
the approval of the Director and the Governor, in anticipation of the issue of notes or bonds under
the authority of this Act, to advance to the capital development bond fund for the purposes specified
in Section 6 hereof, any funds of the State not specifically held for any particular purpose; provided,
however, that all advances made to the capital development bond fund shall be returned to the
general fund from the capital development bond fund forthwith upon the receipt by the capital
LC006416 - Page 11 of 13

development fund of proceeds resulting from the issue of notes or bonds to the extent of such
advances.
SECTION 12. Federal assistance and private funds. -- In carrying out this act, the Director,
or his or her designee, is authorized on behalf of the State, with the approval of the Governor, to
apply for and accept any federal assistance which may become available for the purpose of this
Act, whether in the form of loan or grant or otherwise, to accept the provision of any federal
legislation therefor, to enter into, act and carry out contracts in connection therewith, to act as agent
for the federal government in connection therewith, or to designate a subordinate so to act. Where
federal assistance is made available, the project shall be carried out in accordance with applicable
federal law, the rules and regulations thereunder and the contract or contracts providing for federal
assistance, notwithstanding any contrary provisions of State law. Subject to the foregoing, any
federal funds received for the purposes of this Act shall be deposited in the capital development
bond fund and expended as a part thereof. The Director or his or her designee may also utilize any
private funds that may be made available for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 13. Effective Date. -- Sections 1, 2, 3, 11, 12 and this Section 13 of this act shall
take effect upon passage. The remaining sections of this act shall take effect when and if the State
Board of Elections shall certify to the Secretary of State that a majority of the qualified electors
voting on the proposition contained in Section 1 hereof have indicated their approval of all or any
projects thereunder.
========
LC006416
========
LC006416 - Page 12 of 13